South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5475.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The imposition of the user fee on gasoline and diesel fuel pursuant to Section 12-28-310, and the imposition of the road tax pursuant to Section 56-11-410 are suspended for ninety days from the effective date of this joint resolution. Upon the conclusion of ninety days, the impositions are reinstated at the rates set by law. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----